Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2038.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definitions of "daily drawing" and "weekly drawing" in section 103 of the act of December 19, 1988 (P.L.1262, No.156), known as the Local Option Small Games of Chance Act, are amended and the section is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 103. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall, except as provided under section 902, have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:12345678910111213141516171819202122 * * *"Daily drawing." A game of chance in which a bona fide member selects or is assigned a number for a chance at a prize with the winner determined by random drawing to take place on the licensed eligible organization's licensed premises during the same operating day. The term includes games of chance commonly known as "member sign-in lotteries" and "half-and-half lotteries." Daily drawing winners may be determined with the aid of a passive selection device or reference to drawings conducted by the department pursuant to the act of August 26, 1971 (P.L.351, No.91), known as the State Lottery Law. Daily drawing chances may not be sold for an amount in excess of [$1] $10, and no more than one chance per individual may be sold per drawing. Nothing in this definition shall restrict an eligible organization from conducting more than one drawing per day. After a daily drawing is held, a bona fide member may immediately select a number for a chance at a prize for the next day's daily drawing.* * *"Monthly drawing." A game of chance in which a bona fide member selects or is assigned a number or numbers for a chance at a prize with the winner determined by random drawing to take place on the licensed eligible organization's licensed premises during an operating month. Nothing in this act shall be construed to prohibit the carrying over of a jackpot where the winning number has not been entered in the game in a particular month. Monthly drawing winners may be determined with the aid of a passive selection device or reference to drawings conducted by the Department of Revenue pursuant to the act of August 26, 1971 (P.L.351, No.91), known as the State Lottery Law. Monthly 20250HB2038PN2608 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 drawing chances may not be sold for an amount in excess of $10.* * *"Weekly drawing." A game of chance in which a bona fide member selects or receives a number or numbers for a chance at a prize with the winner determined by a random drawing to take place on the licensed eligible organization's licensed premises at the end of a seven-day period. Weekly drawing winners may be determined with the aid of a passive selection device or reference to drawings conducted by the Department of Revenue pursuant to the act of August 26, 1971 (P.L.351, No.91), known as the State Lottery Law. Weekly drawing chances may not be sold for an amount in excess of [$1] $10. After a weekly drawing is held, a bona fide member may immediately select a number for a chance at a prize for the next weekly drawing.Section 2. Section 302 of the act is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 302. Prize limits.* * *(h.1) Monthly drawing carryover exception.--Monthly drawings shall be governed by the prize limitation contained in subsection (b). The prize limitation contained in subsection (b) may be exceeded by a monthly drawing under the following circumstances: a monthly drawing may award a prize where the cash value is in excess of $35,000 if such prize is the result of a carryover of a drawing or drawings which resulted from the winning number or numbers in such drawing or drawings not being among the eligible entrants in such drawings. Nothing contained in this chapter shall authorize the prize limitation under subsection (b) to be exceeded as a result of a failure to conduct a drawing for a month during which chances were sold for 20250HB2038PN2608 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a monthly drawing or for a monthly drawing for which chances were sold in excess of $1.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2038PN2608 - 4 - 1234